Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 7. Surplus Lines Brokers.

Sec. 21.27.790.
Surplus lines broker qualifications.

In addition to the general qualifications under AS

21.27.020

, to qualify for issuance or for renewal of a resident surplus lines broker license, an applicant or licensee shall

be licensed as either an insurance producer or managing general agent for property and casualty lines of authority;

if required by the director by regulation, maintain a bond as described in AS

21.27.190

in an amount acceptable to the director that requires the surplus lines broker to conduct business under this title, promptly remit the taxes and fees required by law, return premiums promptly when due, and pay proper losses promptly;

if the director requires, maintain an errors and omissions insurance policy acceptable to the director.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 61 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 27 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 44 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Sec. 21.27.800.
Trainee surplus lines broker. [Repealed, § 53 ch 96 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 21.27.810.
Surplus lines broker records.

In addition to any other records requirements under this chapter, a surplus lines broker shall maintain in organized form a complete record including

the amount of insurance and perils insured;

a complete description of property insured and the location of the property;

gross premium charged;

a return premium paid;

the rate of premium charged upon the several items of property;

the effective date of the contract and the terms of the contract;

the name and address of the insured;

the name and address of the insurer;

the amount of tax and other sums to be collected from the insured;

the allocation of taxes by state under AS

21.34.180

;

evidence of insurance issued in compliance with AS

21.34.100

;

the identity and license number of the producing broker;

any confirming correspondence from the insurer or the representative of the insurer; and

the application.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.27.820.
Denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of surplus lines broker license.

In addition to other action available under this title, the director may deny issuance of or not renew a license, or may suspend or revoke a license of a surplus lines broker issued under this chapter for any of the following causes:

removal of the resident surplus lines broker’s office from this state;

removal of the resident surplus lines broker’s accounts and records from this state during the period within which the accounts and records are required to be maintained under this chapter;

removal of the nonresident surplus lines broker’s accounts and records required to be maintained under this chapter from the location described in the license without prior approval of the director;

closing of the surplus lines broker’s office for a period of more than 45 calendar days, unless permission is granted by the director;

failure to make a required report;

failure to transmit a required tax or fee on a surplus line premium to this state or a reciprocal state to which a tax is owing;

failure to maintain a required bond.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992)